Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6629XS (4) 91 da/js S.F. 2266 Section 1. Section 466B.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. âDivisionâ means the division of soil 3 conservation and water quality created within the department of 4 agriculture and land stewardship. 5 Sec. 2. Section 466B.3, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 6 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 b. The director of the division of soil conservation and 8 water quality within the department of agriculture and land 9 stewardship or the directorâs designee. 10 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 466B.12 Disaggregated data reporting. 11 In addition to providing and updating reports that include 12 aggregated data regarding surface water quality measurements 13 resulting from monitoring, the department of natural resources 14 and the division shall disaggregate the data to indicate 15 the water quality measurements delineating nonpoint source 16 contributions to designated use segments according to 17 surface water classifications established by the department 18 of natural resources. The department of natural resources 19 and the division shall publish and update water quality 20 reports specifying the disaggregated data on an internet 21 site administered cooperatively by the department of natural 22 resources and the division. 23 Sec. 4. Section 466B.41, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 24 by striking the subsection. 25 Sec. 5. Section 466B.49, Code 2026, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 466B.49 Confidentiality. 28 1. Any Except as provided in subsection 2, any information 29 received, collected, or held under this subchapter is a 30 confidential record, and is exempted from public access as 31 provided in section 22.7 , if all of the following apply: 32 1. a. The information is received, collected, or held by 33 a nonprofit organization that conducts nutrient management 34 research, including but not limited to conducting evaluations, 35 -1- LSB 6629XS (4) 91 da/js 1/ 2 S.F. 2266 assessments, or validations. 1 2. b. The information identifies any of the following: 2 a. (1) A person who holds a legal interest in agricultural 3 land or who has previously held a legal interest in 4 agricultural land. 5 b. (2) A person who is involved or who has previously been 6 involved in managing the agricultural land or producing crops 7 or livestock on the agricultural land. 8 c. (3) The identifiable location of the agricultural land. 9 2. Subsection 1 does not apply to data collected to 10 delineate a nonpoint source that contributes to a surface water 11 classified as a designated use segment as described in section 12 466B.12. 13